Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ACCESSIBLE SPACE, INC.; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $600,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Accessible Space, Inc., a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to construct improvements and betterments of a capital nature to low-income accessible housing units located at 1680 Eastwood Road SE and 3461 Kenosha Drive NW in the city of Rochester. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end